Maryland, session 2025, HB0540.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
7–117.1.
(A) (1) THE GOVERNOR SHALL INCLUDE IN THE ANNUAL BUDGET BILL
AN APPROPRIATION IN THE FOLLOWING AMOUNTS TO THE MARYLAND
ASSOCIATION OF ENVIRONMENTAL AND OUTDOOR EDUCATION:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0540*

HOUSE BILL 540
(I) FOR FISCAL YEAR 2027, $70,000; AND
(II) FOR FISCAL YEAR 2028, $40,000.
(2) THE APPROPRIATIONS MADE UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION MAY BE USED BY THE MARYLAND ASSOCIATION OF ENVIRONMENTAL
AND OUTDOOR EDUCATION ONLY TO:
(I) UPDATE AND MAINTAIN ITS MARYLAND GREEN SCHOOLS
WEBSITE IN ACCORDANCE WITH SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION;
(II) CONDUCT OUTREACH ACTIVITIES IN ACCORDANCE WITH
SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION; AND
(III) UPDATE ITS AWARD APPLICATION IN ACCORDANCE WITH
SUBSECTION (D) OF THIS SECTION.
(B) (1) THE MARYLAND ASSOCIATION OF ENVIRONMENTAL AND
OUTDOOR EDUCATION SHALL UPDATE ITS MARYLAND GREEN SCHOOLS WEBSITE
BY MARCH 1, 2027, TO CONTAIN THE INFORMATION LISTED UNDER THIS
SUBSECTION.
(2) THE WEBSITE SHALL INCLUDE A NOVICE SECTION DEDICATED TO
INTRODUCING SCHOOLS TO THE CONCEPT OF BECOMING A GREEN SCHOOL,
INCLUDING:
(I) EXAMPLES OF SIMPLE GREEN ACTIVITIES THAT:
1. ARE ALIGNED WITH THE MARYLAND
ENVIRONMENTAL LITERACY STANDARDS; AND
2. AWARDED GREEN SCHOOLS HAVE COMPLETED OR
ARE COMPLETING IN THE STATE, INCLUDING CORRESPONDING PHOTOGRAPHS AND
ENVIRONMENTAL LITERACY STANDARDS FOR THE ACTIVITIES; AND
(II) ACTIVITIES, PROGRAMMING, PEDAGOGY, AND OTHER
INITIAL ACTIONS THAT WILL ENCOURAGE SCHOOLS TO BEGIN GREEN ACTIVITIES AT
THEIR SCHOOL.
(3) THE WEBSITE SHALL INCLUDE AN ON–RAMP SECTION DEDICATED
TO HELPING SCHOOLS TRANSITION FROM STAND–ALONE GREEN ACTIVITIES TO
MORE COMPLICATED GREEN ACTIVITIES AND PROJECTS AND THE DEVELOPMENT OF
OUTLINED PLANS FOR BECOMING AN AWARDED GREEN SCHOOL, INCLUDING:

HOUSE BILL 540 3
(I) EXAMPLES OF MORE COMPLICATED GREEN ACTIVITIES AND
PROJECTS, INCLUDING ACTIVITIES AND PROJECTS THAT HAVE SUSTAINABILITY
ASPECTS OR INVOLVE MULTIYEAR IMPLEMENTATION, THAT SCHOOLS HAVE
COMPLETED OR ARE COMPLETING IN THE STATE AND CORRESPONDING
PHOTOGRAPHS AND ENVIRONMENTAL LITERACY STANDARDS FOR THE ACTIVITIES
AND PROJECTS; AND
(II) STEP–BY–STEP GUIDANCE ON HOW TO CREATE A PLAN FOR
BECOMING AN AWARDED GREEN SCHOOL.
(4) THE WEBSITE SHALL INCLUDE AN APPLICATION SECTION
DEDICATED TO SCHOOLS THAT ARE READY TO APPLY TO BECOME AN AWARDED
GREEN SCHOOL, INCLUDING:
(I) TIMELINES WITH MILESTONES AND DEADLINES;
(II) BLANK SAMPLE APPLICATIONS;
(III) APPLICATION GUIDELINES FOR EACH SECTION OF THE
APPLICATION;
(IV) EXAMPLES OF APPROVED GREEN SCHOOL APPLICATIONS
FROM:
1. URBAN, SUBURBAN, AND RURAL AREAS OF THE
STATE; AND
2. EACH COUNTY;
(V) RECORDED WEBINARS ON HOW TO SUCCESSFULLY
COMPLETE THE APPLICATION;
(VI) NAMES AND E–MAIL ADDRESSES OF TEACHERS AND STAFF
AT AWARDED GREEN SCHOOLS WHO CAN BE CONTACTED FOR GUIDANCE OR
INFORMATION ABOUT THEIR GREEN SCHOOL PRACTICES;
(VII) AN UP–TO–DATE LIST OF FUNDING SOURCES SCHOOLS CAN
APPLY TO FOR ASSISTANCE WITH GREEN SCHOOL–RELATED EFFORTS, INCLUDING
FUNDS AVAILABLE THROUGH:
1. INDIVIDUALS;

HOUSE BILL 540
2. FOUNDATIONS;
3. NONPROFIT ORGANIZATIONS; AND
4. GOVERNMENT ORGANIZATIONS;
(VIII) FOR EACH FUNDING SOURCE LISTED UNDER ITEM (VII) OF
THIS PARAGRAPH:
1. A BRIEF DESCRIPTION OF HOW THE FUNDING SOURCE
MAY BE USED;
2. THE AMOUNT OF THE FUNDING SOURCE; AND
3. DEADLINES FOR EACH FUNDING SOURCE;
(IX) NAMES AND CONTACT INFORMATION OF INDIVIDUALS WHO
CAN ASSIST WITH QUESTIONS REGARDING APPLYING FOR GRANTS FOR GREEN
SCHOOL–RELATED EFFORTS; AND
(X) PLANNED OR SCHEDULED GREEN SCHOOL PROFESSIONAL
DEVELOPMENT OPPORTUNITIES.
(5) (I) EACH SECTION OF THE WEBSITE REQUIRED UNDER
PARAGRAPHS (2), (3), AND (4) OF THIS SUBSECTION SHALL INCLUDE CONTACT
INFORMATION OF INDIVIDUALS, INCLUDING COUNTY ENVIRONMENTAL LITERACY
SPECIALISTS, EXPERTS FROM FACILITIES AWARDED THE MARYLAND GREEN
CENTER AWARD, AND GREEN LEADERS, WHO CAN:
1. FOR THE NOVICE SECTION, ADVISE SCHOOLS ON
START–UP GREEN ACTIVITIES AND FUNDING AND GRANT OPPORTUNITIES
AVAILABLE FOR GREENING THE SCHOOL;
2. FOR THE ON–RAMP SECTION, ADVISE SCHOOLS ON
HOW TO CREATE MORE COMPLICATED GREEN ACTIVITIES AND PROJECTS THAT WILL
SUPPORT AND CONTRIBUTE TO A FUTURE APPLICATION FOR BECOMING AN
AWARDED GREEN SCHOOL; AND
3. FOR THE APPLICATION SECTION, PROVIDE
ASSISTANCE WITH THE APPLICATION PROCESS.
(II) THE CONTACT INFORMATION UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF
THIS PARAGRAPH SHALL INCLUDE:

HOUSE BILL 540 5
1. THE NAME, TELEPHONE NUMBER, AND DIRECT
E–MAIL ADDRESS FOR EACH INDIVIDUAL LISTED;
2. FOR THE NOVICE SECTION, THE TYPES OF ACTIVITIES
AND FUNDING AND GRANT OPPORTUNITIES EACH INDIVIDUAL LISTED CAN ASSIST
WITH;
3. FOR THE ON–RAMP SECTION, THE TYPES OF
ACTIVITIES AND PROJECTS EACH INDIVIDUAL LISTED CAN ASSIST WITH; AND
4. FOR THE APPLICATION SECTION, THE PORTION OF
THE APPLICATION PROCESS EACH INDIVIDUAL LISTED CAN ASSIST WITH.
(C) THE MARYLAND ASSOCIATION OF ENVIRONMENTAL AND OUTDOOR
EDUCATION SHALL REGULARLY:
(1) CONDUCT IN–PERSON INFORMATION SESSIONS AT SCHOOLS TO
INFORM COUNTY SUPERINTENDENTS, SCHOOL ADMINISTRATORS, TEACHERS, AND
PARENTS ABOUT THE GREEN SCHOOL PROGRAM AND THE MARYLAND GREEN
SCHOOLS WEBSITE UPDATED UNDER SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION; AND
(2) CONTACT SCHOOLS IN THE STATE TO GAUGE A SCHOOL’S
INTEREST IN AND CAPACITY FOR STARTING GREEN ACTIVITIES.
(D) (1) (I) THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES, IN
COLLABORATION WITH THE DEPARTMENT AND IN CONSULTATION WITH THE
MARYLAND ASSOCIATION OF ENVIRONMENTAL AND OUTDOOR EDUCATION AND
OTHER RELEVANT PARTIES, SHALL ESTABLISH CRITERIA FOR DESIGNATING GREEN
SCHOOLS IN THE STATE AS GREEN SCHOOLS MENTOR SCHOOLS.
(II) THE CRITERIA FOR DESIGNATING A GREEN SCHOOL AS A
GREEN SCHOOLS MENTOR SCHOOL MAY INCLUDE CONSIDERATION OF:
1. A SCHOOL’S EXPERIENCE PROVIDING GUIDANCE TO
EDUCATORS AND SCHOOLS ON HOW TO TRANSITION THEIR SCHOOL TO A GREEN
SCHOOL;
2. A SCHOOL’S EXPERIENCE WITH PROVIDING A BROAD
SET OF LEARNING OPPORTUNITIES FOR STUDENTS;
3. THE TYPE OF ACTIVITIES OR PROJECTS IN WHICH A
SCHOOL IS ENGAGED;

HOUSE BILL 540
4. THE NUMBER OF STUDENTS A SCHOOL ENGAGES
WITH WHEN CONDUCTING GREEN ACTIVITIES AND PROJECTS;
5. HOW GREEN ACTIVITIES AND PROJECTS CONDUCTED
BY A SCHOOL ALIGN WITH THE ENVIRONMENTAL STANDARDS SET BY THE STATE;
AND
6. THE PERCENTAGE OF A SCHOOL’S STAFF THAT IS
ENGAGED IN NATURE–BASED LEARNING ACTIVITIES AND THEIR RELEVANT
EXPERTISE.
(2) (I) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL DESIGNATE THE MARYLAND
ASSOCIATION OF ENVIRONMENTAL AND OUTDOOR EDUCATION TO DETERMINE
WHETHER A SCHOOL MEETS THE CRITERIA ESTABLISHED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF
THIS SUBSECTION TO OBTAIN A GREEN SCHOOLS MENTOR SCHOOL DESIGNATION.
(II) A GREEN SCHOOLS MENTOR SCHOOL DESIGNATION IS
VALID FOR 1 YEAR.
(3) THE MARYLAND ASSOCIATION OF ENVIRONMENTAL AND
OUTDOOR EDUCATION SHALL UPDATE ITS AWARD APPLICATION BY SEPTEMBER 1,
2026, TO ALLOW APPLICANTS TO INDICATE THEIR INTEREST IN OBTAINING A GREEN
SCHOOLS MENTOR SCHOOL DESIGNATION.
(E) EACH COUNTY BOARD SHALL:
(1) PROMINENTLY DISPLAY A LINK ON THE COUNTY BOARD’S
WEBSITE TO THE MARYLAND GREEN SCHOOLS WEBSITE UPDATED UNDER
SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION; AND
(2) WITHIN THE FIRST 2 WEEKS OF THE FIRST AND THIRD QUARTER
OF EACH SCHOOL YEAR, CIRCULATE INFORMATION TO TEACHERS AND STAFF
ABOUT:
(I) THE GREEN SCHOOL PROGRAM;
(II) THE MARYLAND GREEN SCHOOLS WEBSITE UPDATED
UNDER SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION; AND
(III) THE TIME AND LOCATION OF ANY IN–PERSON INFORMATION
SESSIONS PROVIDED UNDER SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION.

HOUSE BILL 540 7
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.